Utah statutes.
76-10-1508.   Theft of baggage or cargo.

Any person who removes any baggage, cargo or other item transported upon a bus or stored in a terminal without consent of the owner of the property or the bus company, or its duly authorized representative is guilty of theft and shall be punished pursuant to section 76-6-412.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1979 General Session

